Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2405
Incorrect bill; notice to creditor; corrected bill; payment.

When a bill submitted to an agency is filled out incorrectly or when there is any defect or impropriety in a bill submitted, the agency shall notify the creditor in writing prior to the date on which payment in full is due. The notice shall contain a description of the defect or impropriety and any additional information necessary to enable the creditor to correct the bill. Upon receiving a properly corrected bill, the agency shall make payment in full of the bill on or before the forty-fifth calendar day after the receipt of the corrected bill or, when the agency is making payment for goods or services provided by a third party, on or before the sixtieth calendar day after the receipt of the corrected bill.

Laws 1988, LB 1079, § 5.